California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Collaborative agreements with schools, community colleges, independent living programs, child welfare services, job training agencies, CalWORKs providers, regional center services, and transportation and recreation services as needed.

(b) Collaborative teams involving the youth and two or more agencies to develop a transition plan that identifies needs and resources required to successfully transition to independent living as an adult.

(c) Service plans that identify the needs of the youth in the areas of employment, job training, health care, education, counseling, socialization, housing, and independent living skills, to be provided by any of the collaborative agencies and access points for the youth identified.

(d) Assistance with identifying the means for health insurance and educational linkages when the young person is more than 18 years of age.

(e) Specific plans for the young adult to identify individuals and community services that can provide support during the transition to 21 years of age.

(f) Assurances that goals for young adults are individual, identified by the youth, and developmentally appropriate.

(g) Any requirements for interagency collaboration, agreements, or protocols contained in this section shall not diminish requirements for the confidentiality of medical information or information maintained by a county agency or department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5865.3.

When a county system of care services children, zero to five years of age, the following structures and services shall be available, and when not available, the county plan shall identify a timeline for the development of these services:

(a) Collaborative agreements with public health systems, regional center services, child care programs, CalWORKs providers, drug and alcohol treatment programs, child welfare services, and other agencies that may identify children and families at risk of mental health problems that affect young children.

(b) Outreach protocols that can assist parents to identify child behaviors that may be addressed early to prevent mental or emotional disorders and assure normal child development.

(c) Identification of trained specialists that can assist the parents of very young children at risk for emotional, social, or developmental problems with treatment.

(d) Performance measures that ensure that services to families of very young children are individual, identified by the family, and developmentally appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5866.

(a) Counties shall develop a method to encourage interagency collaboration with shared responsibility for services and the client and cost outcome goals.

(b) The local mental health director shall form or facilitate the formation of a county interagency policy and planning committee. The members of the council shall include, but not be limited to, family members of children who have been or are currently being served in the county mental health system and the leaders of participating local government agencies, to include a member of the board of supervisors, a juvenile court judge, the district attorney, the public defender, the county counsel, the superintendent of county schools, the public social services director, the chief probation officer, and the mental health director.

(c) The duties of the committee shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identifying those agencies that have a significant joint responsibility for the target population and ensuring collaboration on countywide planning and policy.

(2) Identifying gaps in services to members of the target population, developing policies to ensure service effectiveness and continuity, and setting priorities for interagency services.

(3) Implementing public and private collaborative programs whenever possible to better serve the target population.

(d) The local mental health director shall form or facilitate the formation of a countywide interagency case management council whose function shall be to coordinate resources to specific target population children who are using the services of more than one agency concurrently. The members of this council shall include, but not be limited to, representatives from the local special education, juvenile probation, children’s social services, and mental health services agencies, with necessary authority to commit resources from their agency to an interagency service plan for a child and family. The roles, responsibilities, and operation of these councils shall be specified in written interagency agreements or memoranda of understanding, or both.

(e) The local mental health director shall develop written interagency agreements or memoranda of understanding with the agencies listed in this subdivision, as necessary. Written interagency agreements or memoranda shall specify jointly provided or integrated services, staff tasks and responsibilities, facility and supply commitments, budget considerations, and linkage and referral services. The agreements shall be reviewed and updated annually.

(f) The agreements required by subdivision (e) may be established with any of the following:

(1) Special education local planning area consortiums.

(2) The court juvenile probation department.

(3) The county child protective services agency.

(4) The county public health department.

(5) The county department of drug and alcohol services.

(6) Other local public or private agencies serving children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 520, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5867.

Counties shall demonstrate a maintenance of effort in children’s mental health services. Any reduction of existing Bronzan-McCorquodale children’s services provided under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) shall be identified and justified in the program proposal developed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5867.5.

Beginning in the 1998–99 fiscal year, county mental health departments that receive full system of care funding, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services in consultation with counties, shall provide to children served by county social services and probation departments mental health screening, assessment, participation in multidisciplinary placement teams and specialty mental health treatment services for
 children placed out of home in group care, for those children who meet the definition of medical necessity, to the extent resources are available. These counties shall give first priority to children currently receiving psychoactive medication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 203.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. County Service Standards [5868. - 5868.]

5868.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish service standards that ensure that children in the target population are identified and receive needed and appropriate services from qualified staff in the least restrictive environment.

(b) The standards shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Providing a comprehensive assessment and treatment plan for each target population client to be served, and developing programs and services that will meet their needs and facilitate client outcome goals.

(2) Providing for full participation of the family in all
 aspects of assessment, case planning, and treatment.

(3) Providing methods of assessment and services to meet the cultural, linguistic, and special needs of minorities in the target population.

(4) Providing for staff with the cultural background and linguistic skills necessary to remove barriers to mental health services resulting from a limited ability to speak English or from cultural differences.

(5) Providing mental health case management for all target population clients in, or being considered for, out-of-home placement.

(6) Providing mental health services in the natural environment of the child to the extent feasible and appropriate.

(c) The responsibility of the case managers shall be to ensure that each child receives the following services:

(1) A comprehensive mental health assessment.

(2) Case planning with all appropriate interagency participation.

(3) Linkage with all appropriate mental health services.

(4) Service plan monitoring.

(5) Client advocacy to ensure the provision of needed services.

(d) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election,
 this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 75.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 76 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5868.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish service standards so that children and youth in the target population are identified and receive needed and appropriate services from qualified staff in the least restrictive environment to correct or ameliorate their behavioral health condition. This section shall not apply to services covered by the Medi-Cal program and services covered by a health care service plan or other insurance coverage.

(b) These standards shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) For services funded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892,
 the county may consult with the stakeholders listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5963.03.

(2) (A) Outreach to families with a child or youth with a serious emotional disturbance or a substance use disorder to provide coordination and access to behavioral health services, medications, housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830, and supportive services as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 5887.

(B) Service planning shall include evaluation strategies that shall consider cultural, linguistic, gender, age, and special needs of the target populations.

(C) Provision shall be made for a workforce with the cultural background and linguistic skills necessary to remove barriers to mental
 health and substance use disorder treatment services due to limited-English-speaking ability and cultural differences.

(D) Recipients of outreach services may include families, the public, primary care physicians, hospitals inclusive of emergency departments, behavioral health urgent care, and others who are likely to come into contact with individuals who may be suffering from either an untreated serious emotional disturbance or substance use disorder, or both, who would likely become homeless or incarcerated if the illness continued to be untreated for a substantial period of time.

(3) Provision for services for populations with identified disparities in behavioral health outcomes.

(4) Provision for full
 participation of the family in all aspects of assessment, service planning, and treatment, including, but not limited to, family support and consultation services, parenting support and consultation services, and peer support or self-help group support, where appropriate for the individual.

(5) Provision for clients who have been suffering from an untreated serious emotional disturbance or substance use disorder, or both, for less than one year and who do not require the full range of services but are at risk of becoming homeless or justice involved unless a comprehensive individual and family support services plan is implemented. These clients shall be served in a manner that is designed to meet their needs, including housing for clients that is immediate, transitional, permanent, or all of these.

(6) Provision for services to be client-directed, to use psychosocial rehabilitation and recovery principles, and to be integrated with other services.

(7) Provision for psychiatric and psychological collaboration in overall service planning.

(8) Provision for services specifically directed to children and youth experiencing first episode psychosis.

(9) Provision for services for frequent users of behavioral health urgent care, crisis stabilization units, and hospitals or emergency departments as the primary resource for mental health and substance use disorder treatment.

(10) Provision for services to meet the special needs of clients who are
 physically disabled, clients who are intellectually or developmentally disabled, or persons of American Indian or Alaska Native descent.

(c) Each child or youth shall have a clearly designated personal services coordinator or case manager who may be part of a multidisciplinary treatment team that is responsible for providing case management services. The personal services coordinator may be a person or entity formally designated as primarily responsible for coordinating the services accessed by the client. The client shall be provided information on how to contact their designated person or entity.

(d) A personal services coordinator shall perform all of the following:

(1) Conduct a comprehensive assessment
 and periodic reassessment of a client’s needs. The assessment shall include the following:

(A) Taking the client’s history.

(B) Identifying the individual’s needs, including reviewing available records and gathering information from other sources, including behavioral health service providers, medical providers, family members, social workers, and others needed to form a complete assessment.

(C) Assessing the client’s living arrangements, employment or education status, and training needs.

(2) Plan for services using information collected through the assessment. The planning process shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the client’s goals and the behavioral health, supportive, medical, educational, social, prevocational, vocational, rehabilitative, housing, or other community services needed to assist the client to reach their goals.

(B) Include active participation of the client and others in the development of the client’s goals.

(C) Identify a course of action to address the client’s needs.

(D) Address the transition of care when a client has achieved their goals.

(3) Assist the client in accessing needed behavioral health, supportive, medical, educational, social, prevocational, vocational,
 rehabilitative, housing, or other community services.

(4) Coordinate the services the county furnishes to the client between settings of care, including appropriate discharge planning for short-term hospital and institutional stays.

(5) Coordinate the services the county furnishes to the client with the services the client receives from managed care organizations, the Medicaid fee-for-service delivery system, other human services agencies, and community and social support providers, including local educational agencies.

(6) Ensure that, in the course of coordinating care, the client’s privacy is protected in accordance with all federal and state privacy laws.

(e) The county shall ensure that each provider furnishing services to clients maintains and shares, as appropriate, client health records in accordance with professional standards.

(f) The service planning process shall ensure children and youth receive age-appropriate, gender-appropriate, and culturally appropriate services or appropriate services based on a characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, to the extent feasible, that are designed to enable recipients to:

(1) (A) Live in the most independent, least restrictive housing feasible in the local community and to live in a supportive housing environment that strives for family reunification.

(B) Rejoin or
 return to a home they had previously maintained with a family member or in shared housing environment that is supportive of their recovery and stabilization.

(2) Engage in the highest level of educational or productive activity appropriate to their age, abilities, and experience.

(3) Create and maintain a support system consisting of friends, family, and participation in community activities.

(4) Access necessary physical health care and maintain the best possible physical health.

(5) Reduce or eliminate serious antisocial or criminal behavior and thereby reduce or eliminate their contact with the justice system.

(6) Reduce or eliminate the distress caused by the symptoms of either mental illness or substance use disorder, or both.

(7) Utilize trauma-informed approaches to reduce trauma and avoid retraumatization.

(g) (1) (A) The client’s clinical record shall describe the service array that meets the requirements of subdivisions (d) and (f) and, to the extent applicable to the individual, the requirements of subdivision (a) and (b).

(B) The State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards for service planning to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(2) Documentation of the service planning process in the client’s clinical record pursuant to paragraph (1) may fulfill the documentation requirements for both the Medi-Cal program and this section.

(h) For purposes of this section, “behavioral health services” shall have the meaning as defined in Section 5892.

(i) For purposes of this section, “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 75) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 76.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. State Department of Health Care Services Requirements [5869. - 5869.]

5869.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide participating counties with all of the following:

(a) Applications for funding guidelines and format, and coordination and oversight of the selection process as described in Article 4 (commencing with Section 5857).

(b) Contracts with each state funded county specifying the approved budget, performance outcomes,
 and a scope of work plan for each year of participation in the children’s system of care program.

(c) Technical assistance related to system evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 205.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Requirement to Collect Reimbursements [5872. - 5872.]

5872.

In order to offset the cost of services, participating counties shall collect reimbursement for services from the following sources:

(a) Fees paid by families, which shall be the same as patient fees established pursuant to Section 14705.

(b) Fees paid by private or public third-party payers.

(c) Categorical funds from sources established in state or federal law, for which persons with mental
 illness are eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 206.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Application for State Regulation Waivers [5875. - 5878.]

5875.

The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall require the State Department of Health Care Services to develop an administrative waiver process for counties that either propose to be, or are considered, system of care counties by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   (AB 1468)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5877.

(a) For system of care counties, or as part of the county program proposal to apply for status as a system of care county, requests may be made for waivers from those state regulations that appear to prevent interagency coordination or collaboration in interagency case management and other service delivery capabilities.

(b) The state regulation or regulations shall be specifically identified in the waiver request, with a statement of the reason why the identified regulation or regulations should be waived and, where applicable, the following:

(1) An assurance as to how planned interagency collaborative activities can meet the program intent of the regulation or regulations.

(2) An explanation as to why the identified regulation or regulations would create duplication of effort with an interagency collaborative approach.

(3) An explanation as to how a waiver of the regulation or regulations would not hinder the ability of the involved state agency’s fiscal accountability or responsibility for federal moneys, and how granting of the waiver would support achievement of estimated cost avoidance, and result in decreased use of group homes, children and adolescent state hospital programs, nonpublic school residential placement, and juvenile justice reincarcerations, and in improved school attendance or performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.

(a) (1) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may waive any state regulatory obstacles to the integration of public responsibilities and resources required for counties which have been approved as system
 of care counties.

(2) The waiver shall remain in effect as long as the local program continues to meet standards as specified in the scope of work plan approved by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the Secretary of the
 Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and those departments designated as single state agencies administering federal programs, shall make every effort to secure federal waivers and any other changes in federal policy or law necessary to support interagency collaboration and coordination in a system of care service delivery system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 207.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Services for Children with Severe Mental Illness [5878.1. - 5878.3.]

5878.1.

(a) It is the intent of this article to establish programs that ensure services will be provided to children with serious emotional disturbance, as defined in Section 5878.2 and that they be part of the children’s system of care established pursuant to this part. It is the intent of this act that services provided under this chapter to severely mentally ill children are accountable, developed in partnership with youth and their families, culturally competent, and individualized to the strengths and needs of each child and their family.

(b) This
 act does not authorize any services to be provided to a minor without the consent of the child’s parent or legal guardian beyond those already authorized by existing statute.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 77) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 54.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 55 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 948.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.1.

(a) It is the intent of this article to establish programs that ensure services will be provided to eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892, and that they are part of the children and youth system of care established pursuant to this part.

(b) It is the intent of this act that services provided under this chapter are accountable, developed in partnership with youth and their families and child welfare agencies, are culturally competent, and individualized to the strengths and needs of each child and their family.

(c) This
 act does not authorize a service to be provided to a minor without the consent of the child’s parent or legal guardian beyond those already authorized by existing statute.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 78) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 55.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.2.

(a) For purposes of this article, “children with a serious emotional disturbance” means minors under 18 years of age who meet the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3.

(b) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 79.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.    Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.3.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds as determined pursuant to Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 5890) of this division, county mental health programs shall offer services to severely mentally ill children for whom services under any other public or private insurance or
 other mental health or entitlement program is inadequate or unavailable. Other entitlement programs include but are not limited to mental health services available pursuant to Medi-Cal, child welfare, and special education programs. The funding shall cover only those portions of care that cannot be paid for with public or private insurance, other mental health funds or other entitlement programs.

(b) Funding shall be at sufficient levels to ensure that counties can provide each child served all of the necessary services set forth in the applicable treatment plan developed in accordance with this part, including services where appropriate and necessary to prevent an out of home placement, such as services pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall contract with county mental health programs
 for the provision of services under this article in the manner set forth in Section 5897.

(d) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 80.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.    Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 81 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.3.

(a) (1) (A) Counties shall use funds distributed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 to offer services to eligible children and youth, as defined in of Section 5892, for whom services under other public or private insurance or other mental health, substance use disorder, or other entitlement program is inadequate or unavailable. Counties are not required to spend funds for services pursuant
 to this part from any other source, including funds deposited in the mental health account of the local health and welfare fund.

(B) Other entitlement programs include, but are not limited to, mental health and substance use disorder treatment services available pursuant to Medi-Cal, child welfare, and special education programs.

(C) The funding shall cover only those portions of care that cannot be paid for with public or private insurance, other mental health and substance use disorder funds, or other entitlement programs.

(2) To maximize federal financial participation in furtherance of subdivision (d) of Section 5890, a county shall submit claims for reimbursement to the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with applicable Medi-Cal rules and procedures for a behavioral health service or
 supportive service eligible for reimbursement pursuant to Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396, et seq. and 1397aa, et seq.) when such service is paid, in whole or in part, using funds from the Behavioral Health Services Fund established pursuant to Section 5890.

(3) (A) To maximize funding from other sources, a county shall seek reimbursement for a behavioral health service, supportive service, housing intervention, or other related activity provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892 that is covered by, or can be paid from, another available funding source, including other mental health funds, substance use disorder funds, public and private insurance, and other local, state, and federal funds. This paragraph does not require counties to exhaust other funding sources before using behavioral health services fund moneys to pay for a service or related activity.

(B) A county shall make a good faith effort to enter into contracts or single case agreements with health care service plans and disability insurance plans, pursuant to Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the Insurance Code, as a contracted provider.

(C) A county shall also submit requests for prior authorization for services, request letters of agreement for payment as an out-of-network provider, and pursue other means to obtain reimbursement in accordance with state and federal laws.

(4) (A) A county may report to the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as appropriate, complaints about a health plan’s or a health insurer’s failure to make a good faith effort to contract or enter into a single case agreement with the county.

(B) A county may also report to the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, respectively, a failure by a health plan or insurer to timely reimburse the county for services the plan or insurer must cover as required by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1374.72 and 1374.721 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 10144.5 and 10144.52 of the Insurance Code.

(C) Upon receipt of a complaint from a county, the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as applicable, shall timely investigate the complaint.

(b) (1) Funding shall be at sufficient levels to ensure counties can provide each child served all of the services determined to be necessary during the service planning process in accordance with this part, including
 services where appropriate and necessary to prevent an out of home placement, such as services pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9.

(2) A county may use this funding to provide services to address first episode psychosis.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall contract with county behavioral health programs for the provision of services under this article in the manner set forth in Section 5897.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Behavioral health services” shall have the meaning as defined in Section 5892.

(2) “Substance use disorder treatment services” shall have the meaning as defined in
 subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(3) “Supportive services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 5887.

(e) This act shall not be construed to modify or reduce a health plan’s obligations under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975. 

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 80) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 81.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.    Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. System Evaluation [5879. - 5883.]

5879.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to increase the accountability of mental health and other human services programs whenever feasible by developing and implementing new and useful measures of performance, including client and cost outcomes. The Legislature recognizes the advances in performance and outcome evaluation made by counties funded under previous statutes and seeks to continue this development with future participating counties.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to have a comparison of the performance indicators of each participating county to the state average whenever possible, as well as a comparison of all participating counties as a group to the state averages.

(c) It is the further intent of the Legislature to have a comparison of the performance indicators of participating counties to their history and future anticipated performance based on utilization trends and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5880.

For each selected county the State Department of Health Care Services shall define and establish client and cost outcome and other system performance goals, and negotiate the expected levels of attainment for each year of participation. Expected levels of attainment shall include a breakdown by ethnic origin and shall be identified by a county in its proposal. These goals shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(a) Client improvement and cost avoidance outcome measures, as follows:

(1) To reduce the number of child months in group homes, residential placements pursuant to Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570)
 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and state hospital placements.

(2) To reduce the cost of AFDC-FC group home care, residential placements as described in paragraph (1), and state hospital utilization, by an amount which equals at least 50 percent of the third year project cost. Cost avoidance shall be based on data comparisons of statewide average expenditure and population.

(3) To increase school attendance for pupils in targeted programs.

(4) To increase the grade level equivalent of pupils in targeted programs from admission to discharge.

(5) To reduce the rate of recidivism incurred for wards in targeted juvenile justice programs.

(6) To show measurable improvement in individual and family functional status for a representative sample of children enrolled in the system of care.

(7) To achieve statistically significant increases in services provided in nonclinic settings among agencies.

(8) To increase ethnic minority and gender access to services proportionate to the percentage of these groups in the county’s schoolage population.

(b) System development and operation measures, as follows:

(1) To provide an integrated system of care that includes multiagency programs and joint case planning, to children with serious emotional disturbance as defined in Section 5856.

(2) To identify and assess children who comprise the target population in the county evidenced by a roster which contains all children receiving mental health case management and treatment services. This roster shall include necessary standardized and uniform identifying information and demographics about the children served.

(3) To develop and maintain individualized service plans that will facilitate interagency service delivery in the least restrictive environment.

(4) To develop or provide access to a range of intensive services that will meet individualized service plan needs. These services shall include, but not be limited to, case management, expanded treatment services at schoolsites, local juvenile corrections facilities, and local foster homes, and flexible services.

(5) To ensure the development and operation of the interagency policy council and the interagency case management council.

(6) To provide culturally competent programs that recognize and address the unique needs of ethnic populations in relation to equal access, program design and operation, and program evaluation.

(7) To develop parent education and support groups, and linkages with parents to ensure their
 involvement in the planning process and the delivery of services.

(8) To provide a system of evaluation that develops outcome criteria and which will measure performance, including client outcome and cost avoidance.

(9) To gather, manage, and report data in accordance with the requirements of the state funded outcome evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 56.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5881.

(a) Evaluation shall be conducted by participating county evaluation staff and, subject to the availability of funds, by the State Department of Health Care Services and the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(b) Evaluation at both levels shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure county level systems of care are serving the targeted population.

(2) Ensure the timely performance data related to client outcome and cost avoidance is collected, analyzed, and reported.

(3) Ensure system of care components are implemented as intended.

(4) Provide information documenting needs for future planning.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 82) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 83.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5882.

(a) Participating counties shall assign sufficient resources to performance evaluation to enable the county to fulfill all evaluation responsibilities specified in the contract with the department.

(b) Counties shall cooperate with the department regarding the development of uniform measures of performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 39.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5883.
